Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 102
DIVISION OF BANKING

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 COMMISSIONER AND BANKING BOARD

PART 2 PROCEEDINGS

PART 3 RECORDS, REPORTING, AND INFORMATION

PART 4 ASSESSMENTS AND FEES

PART 5 CONFLICTS OF INTEREST, PENALTIES, REMOVAL, SUSPENSION, ENFORCEMENT